scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_V.yaml
     amikwiishike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indamikwiishike
     amikwiishike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindamikwiishike
     amikwiishike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidamikwiishike
     amikwiishike+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: amikwiishiked
     amwaagone+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindamwaagone
     amwaagone+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: amwaagone
     amwaagone+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: amwaagoned
     amwaagone+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: emwaagoned
     amwaagone+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: gego amwaagoneken
     ana'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indana'
     ana'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindana'
     ana'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidana'
     ana'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ana'o
     ana'o+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ana'od
     ana'o+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ena'od
     anamikaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanamikaage
     anamikaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanamikaage
     anamikaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanamikaage
     anamikaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anamikaage
     anamikaage+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anamikaaged
     anamikaage+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enamikaaged
     anamikodaadiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: indanamikodaadimin
     anamikodaadiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: anamikodaadiwag 
     anamikodaadiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: anamikodaadiwaad
     anamikodaadiwag+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: enamikodaadiwaad
     anamikodaadiwag+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Pl: anamikodaadig 
     anamikodaadiwag+VAI+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Pl: enamikodaadijig
     anaakanike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanaakanike
     anaakanike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anaakanike
     anaakanike+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anaakaniked
     anaakanike+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enaakaniked
     anaamenindiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: indanaamenindimin
     anaamenindiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: anaamenindiwag
     anaamenindiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: anaamenindiwaad
     anaamenindiwag+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: enaamenindiwaad
     anaamindiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: indanaamindimin
     anaamindiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: anaamindiwag
     anaamindiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: anaamindiwaad
     anaamindiwag+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: enaamindiwaad
     anaamindiwag+VAI+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Pl: enaamindijig
     anaamindizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanaamindiz
     anaamindizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanaamindiz
     anaamindizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanaamindiz
     anaamindizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anaamindizo
     anaamindizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anaamindizod
     anaamindizo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enaamindizod
     anaaminge+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanaaminge
     anaaminge+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanaaminge
     anaaminge+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanaaminge
     anaaminge+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anaaminge
     anaaminge+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anaaminged
     anaaminge+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enaaminged
     andabineshiinyiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandabineshiinyiwe
     andabineshiinyiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andabineshiinyiwe
     andabineshiinyiwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andabineshiinyiwed
     andabineshiinyiwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endabineshiinyiwed
     andawamikwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawamikwe
     andawamikwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawamikwe
     andawamikwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawamikwed
     andawasimwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawasimwe
     andawasimwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: andawasimwe
     andawasimwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawasimwed
     andawasimwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawasimwed
     andawataage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawataage
     andawataage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawataage
     andawataage+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawataaged
     andawataage+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawataaged
     andawawinzo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawawinz
     andawawinzo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawawinzo
     andawawinzo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawawinzod
     andawawinzo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawawinzod
     andawaabanjige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawaabanjige
     andawaabanjige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawaabanjige
     andawaabanjige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawaabanjiged
     andawaabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawaab
     andawaabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawaabi
     andawaabi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawaabid
     andawaabi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawaabid
     andawaaboozwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawaaboozwe
     andawaaboozwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawaaboozwe
     andawaaboozwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawaaboozwed
     andawaaboozwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawaaboozwed
     andawendaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawendaagoz
     andawendaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawendaagozi
     andawendaagozi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawendaagozid
     andawendaagozi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawendaagozid
     andawenjige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawenjige
     andawenjige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawenjige
     andawenjige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawenjiged
     andawenjige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawenjiged
     andawinise+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawinise
     andawinise+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawinise
     andawinise+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawinised
     andawinise+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawinised
     andawishibe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandawishibe
     andawishibe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawishibe
     andawishibe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andawishibed
     andawishibe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endawishibed
     andobani+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandoban
     andobani+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andobani
     andobani+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andobanid
     andobani+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endobanid
     andobigiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandobigiwe
     andobigiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andobigiwe
     andobigiwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andobigiwed
     andobigiwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endobigiwed
     andobijige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandobijige
     andobijige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: andobijige
     andobijige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andobijiged
     andobijige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endobijiged
     andobinewe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandobinewe
     andobinewe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andobinewe
     andobinewe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andobinewed
     andobinewe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endobinewed
     andodamaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandodamaage
     andodamaage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andodamaage
     andodamaage+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andodamaaged
     andodamaage+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endodamaaged 
     andodamaageshki+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandodamaageshk
     andodamaageshki+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andodamaageshki
     andodamaageshki+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andodamaageshkid
     andodamaageshki+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endodamaageshkid
     andojige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandojige
     andojige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andojige
     andojige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andojiged
     andojige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endojiged
     andomaanjige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandomaanjige
     andomaanjige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andomaanjige
     andomaanjige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andomaanjiged
     andomaanjige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endomaanjiged
     andomiijime+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandomiijime
     andomiijime+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andomiijime
     andomiijime+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andomiijimed
     andomiijime+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endomiijimed
     andomoozwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandomoozwe
     andomoozwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andomoozwe
     andomoozwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andomoozwed
     andomoozwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endomoozwed
     andomoozwe+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: andomoozwen
     andomoozwe+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Pl: andomoozweyok
     andomoozwe+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+Incl: andomoozwedaa
     andone'ige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandone'ige
     andone'ige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andone'ige
     andone'ige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andone'iged
     andone'ige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endone'iged
     andone'ige+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: andone'igen
     andonge+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandonge
     andonge+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andonge
     andonge+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andonged
     andonge+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endonged
     andonizha'ige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandonizha'ige
     andonizha'ige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andonizha'iged
     andonizha'ige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andonizha'ige
     andonizha'ige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endonizha'iged
     andonizhikige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandonizhikige
     andonizhikige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andonizhikige
     andonizhikige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andonizhikiged
     andonizhikige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endonizhikiged
     andowiigwaase+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandowiigwaase
     andowiigwaase+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andowiigwaase
     andowiigwaase+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andowiigwaased
     andowiigwaase+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endowiigwaased
     andoobiiganjige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandoobiiganjige
     andoobiiganjige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andoobiiganjige
     andoobiiganjige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: nandoobiiganjiged
     andoobiiganjige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endoobiiganjiged
     andoojiinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandoojiinige
     andoojiinige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andoojiinige
     andoojiinige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andoojiiniged
     andoojiinige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endoojiiniged
     andookome+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandookome
     andookome+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andookome
     andookome+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andookomed
     andookome+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endookomed
     andwaanike+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandwaabikinige
     andwaanike+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andwaaniked
     andwaawanwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandwaawanwe
     andwaawanwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andwaawanwe
     andwaawanwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andwaawanwed
     andwaawanwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endwaawanwed
     andwewezige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninandwewezige
     andwewezige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andwewezige
     andwewezige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: andweweziged
     andwewezige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: endweweziged
     angobizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: angobizo
     angobizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: angobizod
     angobizo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: engobizod
     angomaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indangomaagoz
     angomaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindangomaagoz
     angomaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidangomaagoz
     angomaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: angomaagozi
     angomaagozi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: angomaagozid
     angomaagozi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: engomaagozid
     angonaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indangonaagoz
     angonaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindangonaagoz
     angonaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidangonaagoz
     angonaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: angonaagozi
     angonaagozi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: angonaagozid
     angonaagozi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: engonaagozid
     angozo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: angozo
     angozo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: angozod
     angozo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: engozod
     angwaakizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: angwaakizo
     angwaakizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: angwaakizod
     angwaakizo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: engwaakizod
     ani-naagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indani-naagoz
     ani-naagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindani-naagoz
     ani-naagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidani-naagoz
     ani-naagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ani-naagozi 
     ani-naagozi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ani-naagozid
     ani-naagozi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eni-naagozid
     animadaawangose+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimadaawangose
     animadaawangose+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animadaawangose
     animadaawangose+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animadaawangosed
     animadaawangose+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimadaawangosed
     animademo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanimadem
     animademo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimadem
     animademo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanimadem
     animademo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animademo
     animademo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animademod
     animademo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimademod
     animadewe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimadewe
     animadewe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanimadewe
     animadewe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanimadewe
     animadewe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animadewe
     animadewe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animadewed
     animadewe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enimadewed
     anima'amaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indanima'amaaz
     anima'amaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindanima'amaaz
     anima'amaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidanima'amaaz
     anima'amaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anima'amaazo 
     anima'amaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: anima'amaazoyaan
     anima'amaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: anima'amaazod
     anima'amaazo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: enima'amaazod
     animakii'ige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: animakii'ige
